test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ofta_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - офта: # Ordinary nouns 'bear' - full paradigm including MWN
     офта+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: офта
     офта+N+SP+Gen+Indef: офтонь
     офта+N+SP+Abl+Indef: офтта
     офта+N+SP+Dat+Indef: офтонди
     офта+N+SP+Abe+Indef: офтфтома
     офта+N+SP+Comp+Indef: офтошка
     офта+N+SP+Ine+Indef: офтса
     офта+N+SP+Ela+Indef: офтста
     офта+N+SP+Ill+Indef: офтс
     офта+N+SP+Prl+Indef: офтова
     офта+N+SP+Tra+Indef: офтокс
     офта+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: офтозе
     офта+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: офтоне
     офта+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: офтозень
     офта+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: офтонень
     офта+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: офтозти
     офта+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: офтоненди
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: офтодон
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: офтфтомон
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1: офтошкан
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: офтсон
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: офтстон
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: офтозон
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: офтован
     офта+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: офтце
     офта+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: офттне
     офта+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: офтцень
     офта+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: офттнень
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: офттот
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: офтфтомот
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2: офтошкат
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: офтсот
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: офтстот
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: офтозт
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: офтоват
     офта+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: офтоц
     офта+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: офтонза
     офта+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: офтонц
     офта+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: офтонзон
     офта+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: офтонцты
     офта+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: офтонзонды
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: офттонза
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: офтфтомонза
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3: офтошканза
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: офтсонза
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: офтстонза
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: офтозонза
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: офтованза
     офта+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: офтоньке
     офта+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: офтоньконь
     офта+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: офтоньконди
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: офттонк
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: офтфтомонк
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1: офтошканк
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: офтсонк
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: офтстонк
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: офтозонк
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: офтованк
     офта+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: офтонте
     офта+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: офтонтень
     офта+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: офтонтенди
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: офттонт
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: офтфтомонт
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2: офтошкант
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: офтсонт
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: офтстонт
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: офтозонт
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: офтовант
     офта+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: офтсна
     офта+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: офтснон
     офта+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: офтснонды
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: офтодост
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: офтфтомост
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3: офтошкаст
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: офтсост
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: офтстост
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: офтозост
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: офтоваст
     офта+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: офтт
     офта+N+Sg+Nom+Def: офтсь
     офта+N+Sg+Gen+Def: офтть
     офта+N+Sg+Dat+Def: офтоти
     офта+N+Pl+Nom+Def: офттне
     офта+N+Pl+Gen+Def: офттнень
     офта+N+Pl+Dat+Def: офттненди    
     офта+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: офтовок
     офта+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/вок: офтоньвок
     #офта+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Foc/гЕ: офтоньге 
     #синь+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom+Foc/гЕ: синьге 
     офта+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Foc/вок: офттовок
     офта+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Foc/вок: офтондивок
     офта+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Foc/вок: офтфтомовок
     офта+N+SP+Comp+Indef+Foc/вок: офтошкавок
     офта+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Foc/вок: офтсовок
     офта+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Foc/вок: офтстовок
     офта+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc/вок: офтозовок
     офта+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Foc/вок: офтовавок
     офта+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Foc/вок: офтокска
     офта+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтозевок
     офта+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтоневок
     офта+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтозеньге
     офта+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтоненьге
     офта+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтозтивок
     офта+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтонендивок
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офттонга
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтфтомонга
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтошканка
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтсонга
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтстонга
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтозонга
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Foc/вок: офтованга
     офта+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: офтоцевок
     офта+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/вок: офттневок
     офта+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: офтценьге
     офта+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Foc/вок: офттненьге
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: офттотка
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Foc/вок: офтфтомотка
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxSg2+Foc/вок: офтошкатка
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Foc/вок: офтсотка
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Foc/вок: офтстотка
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/вок: офтозотка
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Foc/вок: офтоватка
     офта+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтцевок
     офта+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтонзовок
     офта+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтонцка
     офта+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтонзонга
     офта+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтонцтывок
     офта+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтонзондывок
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офттонзовок
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтфтомонзовок
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтошканзовок
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтсонзовок
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтстонзовок
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтозонзовок
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Foc/вок: офтованзовок
     офта+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/вок: офтонькевок
     офта+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Foc/вок: офтоньконьге
     офта+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Foc/вок: офтонькондивок
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: офттонковок
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Foc/вок: офтфтомонковок
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxPl1+Foc/вок: офтошканковок
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Foc/вок: офтсонковок
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Foc/вок: офтстонковок
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Foc/вок: офтозонковок
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Foc/вок: офтованковок
     офта+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/вок: офтонтевок
     офта+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Foc/вок: офтонтеньге
     офта+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Foc/вок: офтонтендивок
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: офттонтка
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Foc/вок: офтфтомонтка
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxPl2+Foc/вок: офтошкантка
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Foc/вок: офтсонтка
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc/вок: офтстонтка
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Foc/вок: офтозонтка
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Foc/вок: офтовантка
     офта+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/вок: офтсновок
     офта+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Foc/вок: офтснонга
     офта+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Foc/вок: офтснондывок
     офта+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: офттостка
     офта+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Foc/вок: офтфтомостка
     офта+N+SP+Comp+PxPl3+Foc/вок: офтошкастка
     офта+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Foc/вок: офтсостка
     офта+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Foc/вок: офтстостка
     офта+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Foc/вок: офтозостка
     офта+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Foc/вок: офтовастка
     офта+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Foc/вок: офттка
     офта+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: офтське
     офта+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: офттьке
     офта+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: офттивок
     офта+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Foc/вок: офттневок
     офта+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Foc/вок: офттненьге
     офта+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Foc/вок: офттнендивок
